Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1232
Department; duties; powers.

(1) The department shall use its best efforts to assure that grant funds awarded to nonprofit development organizations are targeted to the geographic communities or regions with the most pressing economic and employment needs.

(2) The department shall use its best efforts to assure that the allocation of grant funds provides equitable access to the benefits provided by the Rural Workforce Housing Investment Act to all eligible geographical areas.

(3) The department may contract with a statewide public or private nonprofit organization or a state instrumentality which shall serve as agent for the department to help carry out the purposes and requirements of the Rural Workforce Housing Investment Act. The department or its agent may only use for expenses that portion of the funds available for the workforce housing grant program through the Rural Workforce Housing Investment Fund necessary to cover the actual costs of administering the program, including, but not limited to, the hiring of staff.

Laws 2017, LB518, § 7;

Laws 2026, LB768, § 15.
July 18, 2026